test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-atoskahew_gt-norm.yaml
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1SgO: atoskahici # 1 and 2-3Sg INVERSE (3Sg-1 and 2)
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2SgO: atoskahiski
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1PlO: atoskahikoyâhki
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+12PlO: [atoskahikoyahko, atoskahikoyahki]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2PlO: atoskahikoyêko
     
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: atoskahikoci # 3-4, 4-5 INVERSE (4-3, 5-4)
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: atoskahikotwâwi 
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: atoskahikoyici
     
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+1SgO: atoskahitwâwi # 1 and 2-3Pl INVERSE (3Pl-1 and 2)
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+2SgO: atoskahiskwâwi
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+1PlO: atoskahikoyâhkwâwi
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+12PlO: atoskahikoyahkwâwi
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+2PlO: atoskahikoyêkwâwi
     
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+1SgO: atoskahiyani # Local sets (2-1) Okimāsis 112
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+1SgO: atoskahiyêko
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: atoskahiyâhki
     
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+2SgO: atoskahitâni # Local sets INV (1-2) Okimāsis 112
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+2PlO: atoskahitako
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+2Sg/PlO: atoskahitâhki
